Hawaii statutes.
§437D-5.5 Offers or sales of
collision insurance by lessors or limited line motor vehicle rental company
producers. (a) The provisions in this chapter relating to or otherwise
regulating the offer or sale of damage waivers shall apply to the offer or sale
of collision insurance by lessors or limited line motor vehicle rental company
producers.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, collision
insurance means coverage to pay a specified amount to or on behalf of the
lessee for claims by the lessor relating to loss of or damage to the rented
vehicle. The definitions of collision insurance and damage waiver stated in
this chapter shall apply only to this chapter. No definition of insurance in
this chapter or in any other statute shall be deemed to include damage waiver
as defined in this chapter. [L 2002, c 235, §2; am L 2009, c 148, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next